Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.625.110

Awards.

The board of directors of the school district shall make the final determination as to whether an employee suggestion award will be made and shall determine the nature and extent of the award. The award shall not be a regular or supplemental compensation program for all employees and the suggestion must, in fact, result in actual savings greater than the award amount. Any moneys which may be awarded to an employee as part of an employee suggestion program shall not be considered salary or compensation for the purposes of RCW 28A.400.200 or chapter 41.40 RCW.

[ 1990 c 33 s 519; 1987 1st ex.s. c 2 s 207; 1986 c 143 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.02.325.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1987 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 84.52.0531.

Effective date—1986 c 143: See note following RCW 28A.625.100.